Texas statutes.
ELECTION CODE

TITLE 7. EARLY VOTING

SUBTITLE A. EARLY VOTING

CHAPTER 84. APPLICATION FOR BALLOT

SUBCHAPTER A. APPLICATION FOR BALLOT

Sec. 84.001. APPLICATION REQUIRED. (a) To be entitled to vote an early voting ballot by mail, a person who is eligible for early voting must make an application for an early voting ballot to be voted by mail as provided by this title.

(b) Subject to Section 1.011, an application must be submitted in writing and signed by the applicant using ink on paper. An electronic signature or photocopied signature is not permitted.

(c) An applicant is not required to use an official application form.

(d) An application must be submitted by mail to the early voting clerk for the election who serves the election precinct of the applicant's residence.

(d-1) A timely application that is addressed to the wrong early voting clerk shall be forwarded to the proper early voting clerk not later than the day after the date it is received by the wrong clerk.

(e) An applicant for a ballot to be voted by mail may apply for ballots for the main election and any resulting runoff election on the same application. If an application for the main election and any resulting runoff is not timely for the main election, it will be considered timely for any resulting runoff if received not later than the deadline, determined using the date of the runoff election, for submitting a regular application for a ballot to be voted by mail.

(f) A person who has not made an application as provided by this title is not entitled to receive an early voting ballot to be voted by mail.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 472, Sec. 20, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.07; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1349, Sec. 33, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1381, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 890, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 854, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 633, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1050 (H.B. 1927), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 5), Sec. 3, eff. December 1, 2017.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 5.01, eff. December 2, 2021.

Sec. 84.002. CONTENTS OF APPLICATION. (a) An early voting ballot application must include:

(1) the applicant's name and the address at which the applicant is registered to vote;

(1-a) the following information:

(A) the number of the applicant's driver's license, election identification certificate, or personal identification card issued by the Department of Public Safety;

(B) if the applicant has not been issued a number described by Paragraph (A), the last four digits of the applicant's social security number; or

(C) a statement by the applicant that the applicant has not been issued a number described by Paragraph (A) or (B);

(2) for an application for a ballot to be voted by mail on the ground of absence from the county of residence, the address outside the applicant's county of residence to which the ballot is to be mailed;

(3) for an application for a ballot to be voted by mail on the ground of age or disability, the address of the hospital, nursing home or other long-term care facility, or retirement center, or of a person related to the applicant within the second degree by affinity or the third degree by consanguinity, as determined under Chapter 573, Government Code, if the applicant is living at that address and that address is different from the address at which the applicant is registered to vote;

(4) for an application for a ballot to be voted by mail on the ground of confinement in jail, the address of the jail or of a person related to the applicant within the degree described by Subdivision (3);

(5) for an application for a ballot to be voted by mail on any ground, an indication of each election for which the applicant is applying for a ballot;

(6) an indication of the ground of eligibility for early voting; and

(7) for an application for a ballot to be voted by mail on the ground of involuntary civil commitment, the address of the facility operated by or under contract with the Texas Civil Commitment Office or of a person related to the applicant within the degree of consanguinity described by Subdivision (3).

(b) An application for a ballot to be voted by mail on the ground of absence from the county of residence must indicate that the applicant satisfies the requirements prescribed by Section 82.001.

(b-1) A person may use the number of a driver's license, election identification certificate, or personal identification card that has expired for the purpose of fulfilling the requirement under Subsection (a)(1-a) if the license or identification is otherwise valid.

(c) An application for a ballot to be voted by mail on the ground of disability must require the applicant to affirmatively indicate that the applicant agrees with the statement, "I have a sickness or physical condition that prevents me from appearing at the polling place on election day without a likelihood of needing personal assistance or injuring my health," as prescribed by Section 82.002(a).

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 472, Sec. 21, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 1.04; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 565, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1381, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 47, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 728 (H.B. 3920), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 5.02, eff. December 2, 2021.

Sec. 84.0021. CONTENTS OF APPLICATION FOR PARTICIPANT IN ADDRESS CONFIDENTIALITY PROGRAM; CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION. (a) An early voting ballot application submitted by a qualified voter who is eligible for early voting by mail under Section 82.007 must include:

(1) the applicant's name and address at which the applicant is registered to vote;

(2) the substitute post office box address designated by the attorney general under Article 58.052(b), Code of Criminal Procedure, for use by the voter in place of the voter's true residential, business, or school address; and

(3) an indication of each election for which the applicant is applying for a ballot.

(b) The information contained in an application under this section relating to the address at which the applicant is registered to vote is confidential, except that the information must be disclosed if:

(1) requested by a law enforcement agency; or

(2) required by court order.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1295 (S.B. 74), Sec. 8, eff. June 15, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 469 (H.B. 4173), Sec. 2.29, eff. January 1, 2021.

Sec. 84.003. SIGNING APPLICATION BY WITNESS; ASSISTING APPLICANT. (a) An early voting ballot application signed for the applicant by a witness other than the early voting clerk or a deputy must indicate the witness's relationship to the applicant or, if unrelated, indicate that fact.

(b) A person who acts as a witness for an applicant for an early voting ballot application commits an offense if the person knowingly fails to comply with Section 1.011. A person who in the presence of the applicant otherwise assists an applicant in completing an early voting ballot application commits an offense if the person knowingly fails to comply with Section 1.011(d) in the same manner as a witness.

(c) An offense under this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

(d) Subsection (b) does not apply if the person is related to the applicant within the second degree by affinity or the third degree by consanguinity, as determined under Subchapter B, Chapter 573, Government Code, or is registered to vote at the same address as the applicant.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.07; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 393, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 84.004. UNLAWFULLY WITNESSING APPLICATION FOR MORE THAN ONE APPLICANT. (a) A person commits an offense if:

(1) the person signs an application for a ballot to be voted by mail as a witness for more than one applicant in the same election; or

(2) the person signs an application for annual ballots by mail as a witness for more than one applicant in the same calendar year.

(b) It is an exception to the application of Subsection (a) that the person signed early voting ballot applications for more than one applicant:

(1) as an early voting clerk or deputy early voting clerk; or

(2) and the person is related to the additional applicants as a parent, grandparent, spouse, child, or sibling.

(c) A violation of this section does not affect the validity of an application involved in the offense.

(d) Each application signed by the witness in violation of this section constitutes a separate offense.

(e) An offense under this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.07; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 393, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1050 (H.B. 1927), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 84.0041. FRAUDULENT USE OF APPLICATION FOR BALLOT BY MAIL. (a) A person commits an offense if the person:

(1) knowingly provides false information on an application for ballot by mail;

(2) intentionally causes false information to be provided on an application for ballot by mail;

(3) knowingly submits an application for ballot by mail without the knowledge and authorization of the voter; or

(4) knowingly and without the voter's authorization alters information provided by the voter on an application for ballot by mail.

(b) An offense under this section is a state jail felony.

(c) An offense under Subsection (a)(4) does not apply to an early voting clerk or deputy early voting clerk who receives and marks an application for administrative purposes only.

(d) An offense under this section is increased to the next higher category of offense if it is shown on the trial of an offense under this section that:

(1) the defendant was previously convicted of an offense under this code;

(2) the offense involved a voter 65 years of age or older; or

(3) the defendant committed another offense under this section in the same election.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 472, Sec. 22, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.07; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 565, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1381, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 393, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 5), Sec. 4, eff. December 1, 2017.

Sec. 84.005. APPLICATION COMPONENTS. Each document that contains information required for an early voting ballot application and that is submitted to the early voting clerk and any envelope in which an application is submitted are part of the early voting ballot application.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.07; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 84.007. SUBMITTING APPLICATION FOR BALLOT VOTED BY MAIL: GENERAL RULE. (a) Except as provided by Sections 84.008 and 84.009, an application for a ballot to be voted by mail must be submitted as provided by this section.

(b) An application must be submitted to the early voting clerk by:

(1) mail;

(2) common or contract carrier;

(3) subject to Subsection (b-1), telephonic facsimile machine, if a machine is available in the clerk's office; or

(4) subject to Subsection (b-1), electronic transmission of a scanned application containing an original signature.

(b-1) For an application for ballot by mail submitted by telephonic facsimile machine or electronic transmission to be effective, the application also must be submitted by mail and be received by the early voting clerk not later than the fourth business day after the transmission by telephonic facsimile machine or electronic transmission is received.

(c) Except as provided by Section 86.0015(b), an application may be submitted at any time in the year of the election for which a ballot is requested, but not later than the close of regular business in the early voting clerk's office or 12 noon, whichever is later, on the 11th day before election day unless that day is a Saturday, Sunday, or legal state or national holiday, in which case the last day is the first preceding regular business day.

(d) An application is considered to be submitted at the time of its receipt by the clerk.

(e) The early voting clerk shall designate an e-mail address for receipt of an application under Subsection (b)(4). The secretary of state shall include the e-mail address designated by each early voting clerk on the secretary of state's website.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 472, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 1.05; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 728, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1164 (H.B. 2817), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1178 (S.B. 910), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1050 (H.B. 1927), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 5), Sec. 5, eff. December 1, 2017.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 48, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 84.008. SUBMITTING APPLICATION FOR BALLOT VOTED BY MAIL: PERSONAL DELIVERY. (a) Except as otherwise provided by this code, an applicant for a ballot to be voted by mail may submit the application by delivering it in person to the early voting clerk if the application is submitted not later than the deadline provided by Section 84.007(c).

(b) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 99(7), eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.07; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 71, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 49, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 99(7), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 84.009. SUBMITTING APPLICATION FOR BALLOT VOTED BY MAIL: CONFINEMENT IN JAIL. (a) On request of the applicant, an application for a ballot to be voted by mail on the ground of confinement in jail may be submitted to the early voting clerk, at the discretion of the authority in charge of the jail, by personal delivery by the jail authority or by a designated subordinate of the authority.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1050 , Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.07; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1050 (H.B. 1927), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 84.010. PRESERVATION OF APPLICATION. Each early voting ballot application shall be preserved after the election for the period for preserving the precinct election records.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.07; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 84.011. OFFICIAL APPLICATION FORM. (a) The officially prescribed application form for an early voting ballot must include:

(1) immediately preceding the signature space the statement: "I certify that the information given in this application is true, and I understand that giving false information in this application is a crime.";

(2) a statement informing the applicant of the offenses prescribed by Sections 84.003 and 84.004;

(3) spaces for entering an applicant's voter registration number and county election precinct of registration, with a statement informing the applicant that failure to furnish that information does not invalidate the application;

(3-a) a space for entering the information required under Section 84.002(a)(1-a); and

(4) on an application for a ballot to be voted by mail:

(A) a space for an applicant applying on the ground of absence from the county of residence to indicate the date on or after which the applicant can receive mail at the address outside the county;

(B) a space for indicating the fact that an applicant whose application is signed by a witness cannot make the applicant's mark and a space for indicating the relationship or lack of relationship of the witness to the applicant;

(C) a space for entering an applicant's telephone number, with:

(i) a statement informing the applicant that failure to furnish that information does not invalidate the application; and

(ii) a statement prescribed by the secretary of state explaining the benefits of furnishing that information, including how that information assists the early voting clerk;

(D) a space or box for an applicant applying on the ground of age or disability to indicate that the address to which the ballot is to be mailed is the address of a facility or relative described by Section 84.002(a)(3), if applicable;

(E) a space or box for an applicant applying on the ground of confinement in jail or involuntary civil commitment to indicate that the address to which the ballot is to be mailed is the address of a relative described by Section 84.002(a)(4) or (7), if applicable;

(F) a space for an applicant applying on the ground of age or disability to indicate if the application is an application under Section 86.0015;

(G) spaces for entering the signature, printed name, and residence address of any person assisting the applicant;

(H) a statement informing the applicant of the condition prescribed by Section 81.005; and

(I) a statement informing the applicant of the requirement prescribed by Section 86.003(c).

(b) The officially prescribed application form for an early voting ballot to be voted by mail must be at least eight inches by nine inches in size and be printed in at least six-point type.

(c) The secretary of state shall make the statement prescribed by Subsection (a)(4)(C)(ii) available on the secretary's Internet website.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 472, Sec. 24, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 1.06; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 565, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 72, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1381, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 393, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1050 (H.B. 1927), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 50, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 5.03, eff. December 2, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 469 (H.B. 315), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 84.0111. DISTRIBUTION OF APPLICATION FORM. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (c) or as otherwise authorized by this code, an officer or employee of this state or of a political subdivision of this state may not distribute an application form for an early voting ballot to a person who did not request an application under Section 84.001.

(b) An officer or employee of this state or of a political subdivision of this state may not use public funds to facilitate the distribution by another person of an application form for an early voting ballot to a person who did not request an application under Section 84.001.

(c) A political party or a candidate for office may distribute an application form for an early voting ballot to a person who did not request an application under Section 84.001.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 5.04, eff. December 2, 2021.

Sec. 84.012. CLERK TO MAIL APPLICATION FORM ON REQUEST. The early voting clerk shall mail without charge an appropriate official application form for an early voting ballot to each applicant requesting the clerk to send the applicant an application form.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.07; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 73, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1381, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 84.0121. CLERK TO POST APPLICATION FORM ONLINE. (a) The early voting clerk shall post the official application form for an early voting ballot on the clerk's Internet website, if the clerk maintains an Internet website, in a format that allows a person to easily complete the application directly on the website before printing.

(b) The early voting clerk may use the application form provided by the secretary of state under Section 84.013 or the early voting clerk's own application form.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1066 (S.B. 477), Sec. 3, eff. June 18, 2023.

Sec. 84.013. APPLICATION FORMS FURNISHED BY SECRETARY OF STATE. (a) The secretary of state shall maintain a supply of the official application forms for ballots to be voted by mail and shall furnish the forms in reasonable quantities without charge to individuals or organizations requesting them for distribution to voters.

(b) The secretary of state shall provide a printable application for a ballot by mail in a format that complies with Section 84.0121(a) to the early voting clerk for use under that section.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.07; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1066 (S.B. 477), Sec. 4, eff. June 18, 2023.

Sec. 84.014. ACTION BY EARLY VOTING CLERK ON CERTAIN APPLICATIONS. If an applicant provides a date of birth, driver's license number, or social security number on the applicant's application for an early voting ballot to be voted by mail that is different from or in addition to the information maintained by the voter registrar in accordance with Title 2, the early voting clerk shall notify the voter registrar. The voter registrar shall update the voter's record with the information provided by the applicant.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 713 (H.B. 4034), Sec. 6, eff. June 12, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER B. CANCELING APPLICATION FOR BALLOT TO BE VOTED BY MAIL

Sec. 84.031. CANCELLATION OF APPLICATION. (a) An application for an early voting ballot to be voted by mail that has been submitted to the early voting clerk may be canceled only as provided by this subchapter.

(b) A person whose application is canceled, if otherwise eligible, may vote in the same manner as if the application had not been submitted.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.08; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 84.032. REQUEST FOR CANCELLATION. (a) A person desiring to cancel the person's application for a ballot to be voted by mail must submit a request for the cancellation to an election officer as provided by this section.

(b) A request must:

(1) be in writing and signed by the applicant;

(2) specify the election for which the application was made; and

(3) except as provided by Subsection (c), (d), or (e), be received by the early voting clerk:

(A) not later than the third day before election day; and

(B) if an early voting ballot sent to the applicant is returned to the clerk as a marked ballot, before the marked ballot's arrival at the address on the carrier envelope.

(c) An applicant may submit a request after the close of early voting by personal appearance by appearing in person and:

(1) returning the ballot to be voted by mail to the early voting clerk; or

(2) executing an affidavit that the applicant:

(A) has not received the ballot to be voted by mail;

(B) never requested a ballot to be voted by mail; or

(C) received notice of a defect under Section 87.0271(b) or (c) or 87.0411(b) or (c).

(d) An applicant may also submit a request by appearing in person and returning the ballot to be voted by mail or presenting a notice received under Section 86.006(h) to:

(1) the early voting clerk or deputy early voting clerk at any polling place that is open for early voting by personal appearance; or

(2) the presiding election judge on election day at the applicant's precinct polling place.

(d-1) An election officer shall maintain a register of ballots to be voted by mail returned at a polling place under Subsection (d). An election officer shall enter on the register the name of each voter who returns a ballot to be voted by mail and the ballot's number. The secretary of state shall adopt a form to be used for this purpose.

(e) An applicant may also submit a request at any time after the early voting ballot is returned to the early voting clerk as a marked ballot and before the ballot is delivered to the early voting ballot board by appearing in person and executing an affidavit that the applicant did not mark the ballot.

(f) A request for cancellation in a manner other than as authorized by this section, including a request by letter, has no effect.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.08; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 728, Sec. 27, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1381, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 393, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1316, Sec. 21, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 5A.001, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 23.001(23), eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 5), Sec. 6, eff. December 1, 2017.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 5.05, eff. December 2, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1167 (S.B. 1599), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 84.033. ACTION ON REQUEST. (a) The election officer shall review each cancellation request to determine whether it complies with Section 84.032.

(b) If the request complies, the early voting clerk shall cancel the application and enter on the application "canceled" and the date of cancellation.

(c) If the request complies, the presiding election judge shall enter on the returned ballot or the notice, as applicable, "canceled," place it and the request in an envelope, and deposit the envelope in ballot box no. 4. The applicant's application is considered to be canceled.

(d) If the request does not comply, the election officer shall deny the request and enter on the request "denied" and the date of and reason for the denial. The presiding election judge shall place the request in an envelope and deposit the envelope in ballot box no. 4.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.08; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 728, Sec. 27, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1381, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 84.034. NOTICE OF DENIAL. Immediately after denying a cancellation request, the election officer shall notify the applicant of the denial. The notice must state the reason for the denial.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.08; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 728, Sec. 27, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 84.035. BALLOT SENT TO APPLICANT. (a) If the early voting clerk cancels an application by an applicant to whom an early voting ballot has been sent, the clerk shall:

(1) remove the applicant's name from the early voting roster; and

(2) make any other entries in the records and take any other action necessary to prevent the ballot from being counted if returned.

(b) An election judge may permit a person to whom an early voting ballot has been sent who cancels the person's application for a ballot to be voted by mail in accordance with Section 84.032 but fails to return the ballot to be voted by mail to the early voting clerk, deputy early voting clerk, or presiding judge as provided by that section to vote only a provisional ballot under Section 63.011.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.08; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 5.06, eff. December 2, 2021.

Sec. 84.036. DISPOSITION OF RETURNED BALLOT. (a) If an early voting ballot sent to an applicant whose application is canceled is returned to the early voting clerk as a marked ballot, the ballot shall be treated as a marked ballot not timely returned.

(b) After making the appropriate entry on a register maintained under Section 84.032(d-1), an election officer shall deposit a ballot to be voted by mail returned at a polling place under Section 84.032(d) in ballot box no. 4.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.08; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1167 (S.B. 1599), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 84.037. PRESERVATION OF DOCUMENTS. (a) The early voting clerk shall preserve each cancellation request for the period for preserving the precinct election records. If the application is canceled, the clerk shall attach it and the corresponding ballot materials, if available, to the cancellation request and preserve it with the request.

(b) The early voting clerk as defined by Subchapter A, Chapter 83, shall, not later than the 30th day after election day, deliver notice to the attorney general of cancellation requests received, including certified copies of cancellation requests, applications, and carrier envelopes, if available.

(c) The attorney general shall prescribe the form and manner of submission under Subsection (b). The secretary of state shall adopt rules as necessary to implement the requirements prescribed under this subsection.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.08; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 5), Sec. 7, eff. December 1, 2017.

Sec. 84.038. CANCELLATION EFFECTIVE FOR SINGLE ELECTION. The cancellation of an application for a ballot to be voted by mail under Section 84.032(c), (d), or (e) is effective for a single ballot only and does not cancel the application with respect to a subsequent election, including a subsequent election to which the same application applies under Section 84.001(e) or 86.0015(b).

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1050 (H.B. 1927), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2015.